Utah statutes.
17-18-1.5.   Powers -- Duties of county attorney within a prosecution
district -- Prohibitions.
(1)  In each county which is within a state prosecution district, the county
attorney is a public prosecutor only for the purpose of prosecuting violations
of county ordinances or as otherwise provided by law and shall:
(a)  conduct on behalf of the county all prosecutions for violations of county
ordinances committed within the county;
(b)  have authority to grant transactional immunity for violations of county
ordinances committed within the county;
(c)  institute proceedings before the proper magistrate for the arrest of
persons charged with or reasonably suspected of violations of county
ordinances when in possession of information that the violation has been
committed, and for that purpose shall attend court in person or by deputy in
cases of arrests when required;
(d)  when it does not conflict with other official duties, attend to all legal
business required in the county by the attorney general without charge when
the interests of the state are involved; and
(e)  cooperate with the Office of the Attorney General during investigations,
including those described in Subsection 67-5-18(3)(f).
(2)  The county attorney:
(a)  may appear and prosecute in all civil cases in which the state may be
interested; and
(b)  shall render assistance as required by the attorney general in all civil
cases that may be appealed to the Supreme Court and prosecute the appeal from
any violation of a county ordinance.
(3)  The county attorney shall:
(a)  draw all informations for violations of a county ordinance;
(b)  cause all persons informed against to be speedily arraigned;
(c)  cause all witnesses for the county to be subpoenaed to appear before the
court;
(d)  upon the order of the court, institute proceedings in the name of the
county for recovery upon the forfeiture of any appearance or other bonds
running to the county and enforce the collection of them; and
(e)  perform other duties as required by law.
(4)  The county attorney shall:
(a)  ascertain by all practicable means what estate or property within the
county has escheated or reverted to the state;
(b)  require the assessor of taxes of the county to furnish annually a list of
all real or personal property that may have so escheated or reverted; and
(c)  file a copy of the list in the office of the state auditor and of the
attorney general.
(5) The county attorney shall:
(a)  defend all actions brought against the county;
(b)  prosecute all actions for the recovery of debts, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures accruing to the county;
(c)  give, when required and without fee, an opinion in writing to county,
district, precinct, and prosecution district officers on matters relating to
the duties of their respective offices;
(d)  deliver receipts for money or property received in an official capacity
and file duplicates with the county treasurer; and
(e)  on the first Monday of each month file with the auditor an account
verified by oath of all money received in an official capacity during the
preceding month, and at the same time pay it over to the county treasurer.
(6)  A county attorney may not:
(a)  in any manner consult, advise, counsel, or defend within this state any
person charged with any crime, misdemeanor, or breach of any penal statute or
ordinance;
(b)  be qualified to prosecute or dismiss in the name of the county any case
in which the county attorney has previously acted as counsel for the accused
on the pending charge; or
(c)  in any case compromise any cause or enter a nolle prosequi after the
filing of an information without the consent of the court.
(7)  The county attorney or his deputy may be sworn as a deputy district
attorney for the purpose of public convenience for a period of time and
subject to limitations specified by the district attorney.
